Texas, session 892, HB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The heading to Section 418.005, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 418.005.  EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT TRAINING AND CREDENTIALING. SECTION 2.  Section 418.005, Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (c), and (f) and adding Subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) to read as follows: (a)  This section applies only to: (1)  an elected law enforcement officer or county judge, [or] an appointed public officer of the state, or an elected or appointed public officer of a political subdivision, who has management or supervisory responsibilities and: (A)  whose position description, job duties, or assignment includes emergency management responsibilities; or (B)  who plays a role in emergency preparedness, response, or recovery; and (2)  an emergency management coordinator designated under Section 418.1015(c) [by the emergency management director of a county with a population of 500,000 or more]. (c)  The division shall develop and provide a training course related to the emergency management responsibilities of state-level officers and a training course related to the emergency management responsibilities of officers and emergency management coordinators of political subdivisions. The division shall ensure that the training courses: (1)  satisfy the requirements of Subsection (b); and (2)  include information regarding the National Incident Management System (NIMS). (e-1)  The division shall develop a credentialing system that, for each recipient of a certificate of course completion under Subsection (e): (1)  requires the recipient to complete continuing education hours at regular intervals as prescribed by division rule; (2)  verifies the recipient's completion of the required continuing education hours; and (3)  confirms the recipient's identity and, if applicable, the recipient's compliance with criminal background checks and deployment readiness requirements. (e-2)  The division may provide the continuing education courses required by Subsection (e-1) or may contract with a third-party provider for the continuing education courses. The continuing education may include training regarding: (1)  disaster coordination and incident command; (2)  legal and regulatory updates; (3)  mass casualty and shelter management; (4)  risk communication and public information; (5)  radio and wireless operations and operability; and (6)  region-specific hazard preparedness and response. (e-3)  Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the continuing education courses required by Subsection (e-1) may be presented in-person, online, or in a hybrid format. Continuing education courses demonstrating evacuation techniques, tactical rescue coordination, physical response drills, and other skills requiring in-person demonstration and evaluation must be presented in-person. (f)  The failure of one or more public officers of the state or a political subdivision to complete the training or continuing education required by this section does not affect the validity of an action taken by the state or the political subdivision. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.